RIGHTS 
A. General 

1. If your country is a Party to the WTO/TRIPs Agreement, please give a target date by which the Agreement will be fully implemented in your country. 
The Republic of Macedonia on 04.04.2003 became a full member of the World Trade Organization/TRIPs Agreement (“Official Gazette of RM” – International Treaties No. 7/03). The basic legislation for meeting the requirements by the TRIPs Agreement regarding copyright and related rights is the Law on Copyright and Related Rights (“Official Gazette of RM” No. 47/96, 3/98 and 98/02, 04/05), and regarding industrial property, the Law on Industrial “Official Gazette of RM” No. 47/02, 42/03 and 9/04), both in complete compliance with the requirements of the TRIPs Agreement. Since the date when the Republic of Macedonia became a WTO member, necessary notifications to the TRIPs Agreement have been deposited. Notification regarding copyright and related rights has been made in accordance with Article 1 paragraph 3 of the TRIPs Agreement, and with regards to already expressed reserve of the Republic of Macedonia referring to Article 5 paragraph 3 of the Rome Convention on the Protection of Rights of Artists, Performers, Phonographic Producers and Broadcasting Organizations (Rome Convention). The work on the notification, i.e., Memorandum for Compliance in accordance with Article 63 paragraph 2 of the TRIPs Agreement, is in progress and it shall be deposited to the TRIPs Council thereafter. 
2. If not, when does your country plan to accede to the TRIPs Agreement? 
The answer is provided in question 05_III_A_ _ 1
3. Which area(s) of intellectual, industrial and commercial property would you identify as requiring further major changes/adaptations to fully comply with the SAA and for what reasons? 
In order to ensure more effective system of protection of copyrights and related rights, the Law Amending the Law on Copyright and Related Rights (“Official Gazette of RM” No.04/05) was adopted on 12.01.2005. The goal is to achieve complete compliance with the EU directives, particularly on: the rental right, lending right and other related rights, legal protection of data bases, copyright and related rights with regards to use in an Information society environment, the resale royalty right etc. In order to establish an effective regime of intellectual property in the field of copyright and related rights, other normative measures are being undertaken under the authority of other state bodies. The Ministry of Finance and the Customs Administration of the Republic of Macedonia are in charge of transposing the appropriate EU Regulation in customs measures regarding pirated and counterfeit goods, whereas the Ministry of Justice is in charge with the modification and amendment of legislation related to judicial authority matters. An Action Plan for European Partnership for 2004 between the Republic of Macedonia and the EU has been drawn to the end of increasing the efficacy level of the entities in implementation and enforcement of the regime for implementation and protection of copyright and related rights. In the upcoming period until 2006, particular emphasis shall be put on the tasks of creating necessary prerequisites for establishing associations for collecting management of the copyright and related rights and enabling their stable performance with regards to complete harmonization with EU directives in the light of rights related to reprography, use of phonograms published for commercial purposes, cable retransmission, the resale royalty right etc. This particularly refers to the fact that in the Republic of Macedonia there is only one association for collecting management of copyright and related rights, the Association of non-scenic musical works. This points to the need of professional technical assistance both for the state bodies and the associations which are to work in this field. With this in mind, the intention of the Republic of Macedonia to achieve the level of protection similar to the one in the countries of the European Union is obvious and included in the other answers in this Chapter of the Questionnaire and Chapter 20, Culture and Audiovisual Policy. It is also an obligation of the SSA. To the end of evaluating the level of compliance of the Macedonian legislation with the EU legislation in the field of industrial property, the Law on Industrial Property from 2002 (“Official Gazette of RM” No. 47/02) was delivered to the relevant EU bodies in July 2003. No opinions or comments on the text of the Law on Industrial Property have been received so far. Concerning compliance of the Law with the directives and regulations of the EU, there is a certain reserve that it does not comply completely with Directive 98/44/EC for Protection of Biotechnological Inventions of the European Parliament and the Council dated 06.07.1998. EU expert opinion will help determine possible failure to comply. It is also necessary to design the methods of its implementation and have comprehensive discussions on possible effects of the application of this Directive, particularly regarding to the human aspect. According to the European Partnership Action Plan for 2004, June 2006, has been set as a deadline for compliance of the Macedonian legislation with the EU legislation in the field of industrial property. 
4. Does your country have plans to accede in the next five years to any international conventions relating to intellectual, industrial and commercial property of which it is not yet a member? If so, which convention(s) and when? 
The Republic of Macedonia is committed to following the world trends in the field of intellectual property and applying the international standards. Therefore, the activities of the World Intellectual Property Organization (WIPO) related to adopting new international treaties in the field of copyright and related rights and in the field of industrial property are closely observed by the Republic of Macedonia. The Republic of Macedonia is willing to undertake all the necessary activities for their signing, ratification or accession. For realization of this commitment in the field of industrial property, the procedure of ratifying the Geneva Act of the Hague Agreement, referring to international registration of industrial design is now in progress.  During the following five years, the Republic of Macedonia is planning to accede the following treaties, conventions and agreements: Trademark Law Treaty (TLT), Patent Law Treaty (PLT),  Vienna Agreement Establishing an International Classification of the Figurative Elements of Marks, Nairobi Treaty on the Protection of the Olympic Symbol and International Convention for Protection of New Varieties of Plants (UPOV Convention). 5. Do you have specialised courts or tribunals to hear intellectual or industrial and commercial property cases? How many such cases were the subject of court rulings in the period 2001 to 2003? 
There are no specialized courts or other bodies (e.g. tribunals etc.) acting (only) with cases related to intellectual, industrial and commercial property in the Republic of Macedonia. Courts which act with cases in the field of intellectual property rights protection are the basic courts of first instance organized according to territorial jurisdiction, courts of appeal acting on appeals against the decisions of the basic courts and the Supreme Court of the Republic of Macedonia jurisdictional court acting in the cases of extraordinary legal remedies (Law on Courts (“Official Gazette of RM” No. 36/95: Articles 32, 33 and 34) and the Law on Litigation (“Official Gazette of RM” No. 33/98: Article 1)). Judicial protection of intellectual property in the Republic of Macedonia is provided by civil law protection, penal law protection, administrative and judicial protection. The number of cases subjects to court decisions in the period from 2001 to 2003 is as follows:   Copyrights and related rights : a total of 250 cases   2001 : 94 cases   2002 : 9 cases   2003 : 147 cases   Industrial property : a total of 53 cases   2001 : 9 cases   2002 : 17 cases   2003 : 27 cases. 
6. Does your country provide for a specific border regime preventing importation, exportation and transit of counterfeited and pirated subject matter? 
In the Republic of Macedonia the special border regime for the prevention and control of import, export and transit of counterfeited and pirated products is provided by the following regulations: -  Paragraphs 1 and 3 of the Article 163 of the Customs Law (“Official Gazette of RM” No. 21/98, 26/98, 63/98, 86/99, 25/2000, 109/2000, 31/01, 4/02, 55/02 and 42/03) which regulate the treatment of goods prohibited for import by Customs authorities when they do not comply with conditions prescribed; Article 10 paragraph 1 item 9 of the Customs Administration Law (“Official Gazette of RM” No. 46/04 providing) among other competencies of the Customs authorities, prescribes the control of import, export and transit of goods for which special measures of protection of copyright and related rights and industrial property rights are prescribed; Article 215 of the part related to security measures of the Law on Industrial Property (“Official Gazette of RM” No. 47/02, 42/03 and 09/04) and Article 165 of the Law on Copyright and Related Rights (“Official Gazette of RM” No. 47/96, 3/98, 98/02, 04/05) determine customs measures which can be undertaken by the Customs authorities in cases when the person interested (title of right to industrial property and the title of copyright and related rights) reports that the import of certain goods violates his/her rights regulated by virtue of the aforesaid laws. Customs measures, which can be undertaken by the Customs authorities based on aforesaid two laws are the following: -  Inspect the goods being subject to import accompanied by the title holder or his/her representative and exclude them from circulation or storage in a safe place in cases when the importer does not have appropriate credible evidence of manufacture of the goods being imported; request from title holder who has reported the violation of the rights granted by the aforesaid two laws to leave a deposit for the possible damages incurred by the implementation of the aforesaid measures. The deposit for the possible damage is calculated based on the particularity of the goods in each case and covers the expenses incurred for storage of the goods, and the possible amount due to compensate for damages to the importer or the owner of the goods; immediately notify the importer about the undertaken measures and their destination; cancel the undertaken measures in cases when charges are not pressed for protection of the rights by the title holder related to industrial property within eight days and regarding copyright and related rights within ten days.  -  For the implementation of the aforesaid measures in accordance with Article 15 of the Customs Law and the Law on General Administrative Procedure (“Official Gazette of the SRM” No. 52/56, 10/65, 18/65, 4/77, 11/78, 32/78, 9/86, 16/86, 47/86 and “Official Gazette of RM” No. 44/20), the Customs authority shall notify the interested persons in writing. -  Article 5 paragraph 2 of the Law on Industrial Property and Article 171 of the Law on Copyright and Related Rights provide that foreign legal and natural entities enjoy the same rights as domestic legal and natural entities in the Republic of Macedonia with regards to protection of the rights in the field of industrial property and the protection of copyright and related rights in line with the international treaties signed by the Republic of Macedonia with one or more states, adopted conventions or based on the implementation of the principle of reciprocity as established by the Minister of Justice. As for the penalty policy, offences committed with regards to violation of the aforesaid rights are sanctioned by the laws regulating this field, and as for criminal offences by the provisions in the Penal Code (Official Gazette of RM No. 37/96, 80/99, 4/02, 43/03 and 19/04) Eg.: these offences are sanctioned based on Article 157 of the Penal Code in case of violation of copyright or related rights, so that a penalty of imprisonment of up to 1 year is provided for the basic violations, and up to 5 years for the qualified forms. When the violation is committed by a legal entity, the person in charge of the legal entity is punished. Copies of the copyright artefact referred to the related right and the means for its reproduction are confiscated. When counterfeited goods are in question, Article 272 of the Penal Code may be applied. Charges may be pressed or ex officio procedure initiated by the Public Prosecutor regarding the aforesaid violations. The authorities competent for the implementation of the regulations related to the border regime for import, export and transit of goods and human beings (authorities at the Ministry of Interior and the Customs Administration), in case they are notified during implementation of their competencies (control of goods, persons etc.) or find out in any other way that there are grounds for suspicion that a criminal offence or a petty offence to be persecuted ex officio has been committed,  are obliged to undertake special investigative measures necessary in accordance with Articles 140, 141, 142, 142-a, 142-e, 142-f of the Law on Penal Proceedings (“Official Gazette of RM” No. 15/97, 44/02 and 74/04) for the detection and ceasure of the perpetrators, location of the traces of crime or violation and safety of the objects which may serve as evidence in penal or misdemeanour proceedings initiated ex officio by the competent office of the public prosecutor or the competent court. In order to achieve complete compliance of our legislation with the EU legislation the Draft Law for Customs Measures for Protection of the Rights Related to Intellectual Property has been drafted and will be adopted during 2005. (see 05_Annex_02This law will encompass all the activities and measures which may be undertaken by Customs authorities for the prevention of import, export and transit of counterfeited or pirate products in one regulation, certain measures will be elaborated in more detail and new measures will be provided in accordance with the EU Regulations and directives in force. In the process of preparing this Draft Law supported with technical assistance by the Office for Customs and Fiscal Assistance of the European Union (EU-CAFAO MAK), the provisions of the TRIPs Agreement and the Regulations of the Council of Europe No. 1383/2003 dated on 22.07.2003 have been taken into consideration. 
7. Which system of exhaustion of intellectual, industrial and commercial property rights does your country apply? In particular, does your country apply a system of national or international exhaustion of trademarks? Does your country apply a system of national or international exhaustion of the distribution right (copyright and related rights)? 
Pursuant to Article 25 of the Law on Copyright and Related Rights (“Official Gazette of RM” No. 47/96, 3/98, 98/02) the distribution right shall be considered as exhausted (national exhaustion) in the Republic of Macedonia with the first sale or other type of transfer of the ownership rights of an original or of a copy of a copyright work or a subject matter of a related right with an explicit or tacit consent by the right holder. By the Law Amending the Law on Copyright and Related Rights (“Official Gazette of RM” No.04/05), Article 25 of the LCRR is amended with a new paragraph 2 provided that by exhausting the right of distribution, the author shall retain the rental right of the copyright work, except the architectural structures and works of applied arts and design. After the exhaustion of the right of distribution, the author has a right for an equitable remuneration for the lending. The lending right does not apply to the architectural structures and originals or copies of the works of applied arts and design. With the first sale of the original or of the copy of a fixed performance in the Republic of Macedonia, made with explicit or tacit consent of the performer, it shall be considered that the distribution right of the aforesaid original or copy on the territory of the Republic of Macedonia is exhausted, with the exception of rental of the fixation of the performance. This approach to the exhaustion of the distribution right applies also to phonogram and film producers. Regarding the rights of the broadcasting organisations, the first sale of a fixation or a copy of a fixation of a broadcast in the Republic of Macedonia, transferred by an explicit or a tacit consent of the broadcasting organisation, exhausts the distribution right of the aforesaid fixation or copy of the fixation on the territory of the Republic of Macedonia. As for the rights to databases with ‘sui generis’ protection, the right to control of the sale of copies shall be exhausted by the first sale of a copy of the database made by the right holder or by another persons with his/her consent. Public lending of the aforesaid database is not considered as utilisation thereof. The aforesaid modifications are undertaken aiming compliance with the Directive 92/100/EEC and the Directive 96/9/EC. Pursuant to Article 152 of the Law on Industrial Property (“Official Gazette of RM” No. 47/02, 42/03, 9/04), the trade mark right holder does not have the right to prohibit use of a trade mark for goods or services put on the home market by himself/herself or by his/her consent, except in case when there have been essential modifications made on the goods or modification of their characteristics, or modification of the goods or services made after they have been placed on the market (national exhaustion). 
8. Does your country provide for an effective system of enforcement of intellectual property rights (both copyright and related rights and industrial property rights) to combat piracy and counterfeiting? (a) If YES, is it fully compatible with Directive 2004/48/EC on the enforcement of intellectual property rights? (b) Provisional and precautionary measures? (c) Criminal law provisions? (d) The possibility for the rightholder to obtain damages from the infringing party? (e) Are infringements punishable by penalties? (f) Do judicial authorities have the possibility to order the destruction of counterfeit or pirated goods? (g) Do the administrative and enforcement authorities dispose of sufficient and sufficiently trained staff? What is the average length of the judicial procedures? (h) If NO, what measures, procedures and remedies does your country envisage adopting in order to dispose of an efficient system to fight against piracy and counterfeiting? 
Taking into consideration the facts stated hereunder, we find that there is an effective system for implementation of the rights in the field of intellectual property in the Republic of Macedonia. 
(a) With regards to the facts stated hereunder, we find that the legislation in the Republic of Macedonia complies with Directive 2004/48/EC. (for more details see 05_III_A_ _1
(b) Procedures for provisional measures and security measures are provided by the following laws: In general, by the Law on Litigation (“Official Gazette of RM” No. 33/98, 44/02), Articles 263 and 297 thereof; Law on Copyright and Related Rights (“Official Gazette of RM” No. 47/96, 3/98, 98/02, 04/05), Articles 159, 160, 161, 162, 163 and 164 thereof; Law on Industrial Property (“Official Gazette of RM” No. 47/02, 42/03, 09/04), Articles 213 and 214 thereof; Conditions for ordering provisional measures and its types are provided for by Articles 268 and 269 of the Law on Executive Procedure (“Official Gazette of RM” No. 53/97, 59/2000, 64/03). Article 264 of the Law on Executive Procedure (“Official Gazette of RM” No. 53/97, 59/00, 64/03) provides that the court may order provisional measures on demand of the right holder prior to initiating and during the court or administrative proceedings, as well as after the end of the aforesaid proceedings, until the execution has been carried out. Procedures for provisional measures regarding protection of rights related to industrial property and copyrights and related rights are considered urgent. Plaintiffs may demand copies, means, equipment and documents to be withdrawn from sales and be saved, actions for possible violations or continuation of violations be prohibited, and other provisional measures for the purpose of claims security be undertaken. Proceedings are considered urgent and they shall be undertaken in accordance with the regulation dealing with the executive proceedings. The court may pronounce the measure without hearing the other party (Article 162 of the Law on Copyright and Related Rights – (in the following text as: ‘LCRR’). In case of any doubts that evidence should be secured from destroying or that they would not be secured later, this measure may be pronounced in an urgent procedure in accordance with regulations for proceedings. Inspection of premises, documents, inventory, data bases, computer programs, inspection and deprivation of documents, hearing of witnesses, findings and statements of experts are regarded as providing evidence (Article 163 of the LCRR). Measures for protection also fall under civil measures. Individuals related to violation (manufactures, publishers, importers, consignees or owners, i.e., copy holders of copies, subjects of related rights or means used to violate the right) shall provide information and documents on the violation without delay, and in case that the aforesaid individuals do not provide the information or the documents found in their possession, they shall be held responsible and compensate for the damage incurred due to failure of delivery (Article 164 of the LCRR). Holders of copyrights or related rights may demand inspection of the implementation of the laws and other regulations by inspectors in charge at the Ministry of Culture and require appropriate information on it. They may demand pronouncing a provisional protection measure of deprivation of objects used and intended for committing violations or created by the violation itself, and may submit a request, i.e., a proposal for pressing charges at the courts of competent jurisdiction. In case of premeditated violation, violation due to negligence of a material or other copyright or related right and right in the field of industrial property, the right holder may demand civil penalty of payment of agreed or ordinary compensation for the use thereof, augmented for 200 % no matter whether the violation caused damages of property (Article 160 of the LCRR and Article 216 of the Law on Industrial Property). Plaintiffs (authors or performers) may demand a compensation for violation of personality, honor and reputation or nonproprietary damage in case of violation of the ethics law even when there is no damage regarding property (Article 161 of the LCRR). 
(c) The Criminal Code of the Republic of Macedonia (“Official Gazette of RM” No. 37/96, 80/99, 4/02, 43/03, 19/04) provides the following criminal acts: Article 272: Counterfeit of signs for marking of goods, measures and scale weights– a penalty of imprisonment for a period from 3 months to 5 years,  Article 285: Unauthorized use of somebody’s firm - a penalty of imprisonment for a period of 3 years or a fine , -  Article 286: Unauthorized use of somebody’s invention or software – a penalty of imprisonment for a period of 3 years or a fine.  Protection from violation of copyright and related rights is provided by virtue of Article 157 of the Criminal Code. The aforesaid article provides that everyone who publishes, features, reproduces, distributes, performs and broadcasts without being authorized for it, or who otherwise encroaches somebody’s copyright or related right i.e. copyright work performance or subject matter of related rights without being authorized for it, shall be fined to a fine or punished with imprisonment for a period of one year (paragraph 1). A person who has gained large property, i.e., profit without being duly authorized, shall be punished with imprisonment for a period from three months to three years, i.e., imprisonment for a period from six months to five years (paragraphs 2 and 3). An attempt for the aforesaid violations is also punishable (paragraph 4). Copies of the works of an author or subjects of related rights, as well as means for reproduction shall be confiscated and destroyed (paragraph 5). In cases when the criminal offence is committed by a legal entity, the person in charge shall be fined (paragraph 6). Other provisions of the Criminal Code of the Republic of Macedonia are the following: 1.  “The criminal offence of unauthorized infiltration into a computer system”, Article 251 provides that anyone who deletes, changes, damages, hides or otherwise makes useless computer data, a program, an appliance for maintenance of a computer system or disables or impedes the use of a computer system, data or program or electronic communication without being duly authorized for it, shall be punished to a fine or imprisonment for a period of up to three years (paragraph 1). In case that the aforesaid offences are committed with regards to a computer system, data or programs being protected with special protection measures or used for the work of governmental institutions, public authorities or institutions or for international communication, and the perpetrator is a member of a group established for the purpose of committing such criminal offences, the penalty shall be imprisonment from one to five years (paragraph 3); in cases when the aforesaid criminal offences have enabled significant property for the perpetrator or caused big damage, the penalty shall be imprisonment from one month to ten years (paragraph 5). A penalty of fine or imprisonment for a period of up to one year shall be applied for unauthorized manufacturing, supply, sale, keeping or making available to others special devices, means, computer programs or computer data intended or suitable for committing the aforesaid offence (paragraph 6). 2.  As for the criminal offence of “Computer fraud”, Article 251-b provides that anyone who premeditated illegal gain of property for himself/herself or for another person by entering untrue data into a computer or a computer system, restraining to enter the true data, forging the electronic signature or otherwise causing untrue results of the electronic processing and transfer of data, shall be punished to a fine or imprisonment for a period of up to three years (paragraph 1); in case of large gain of property , the penalty shall be imprisonment for a period from three months to five years; and in cases when the gain of property is significant, the penalty shall be imprisonment for a period from one to ten years (paragraphs 2 and 3). In cases when the intention of the offence is only to damage another person, the aforesaid article provides fine or a penalty of imprisonment for a period of up to one year, and if larger, i.e., significant damage is caused, the penalty shall be imprisonment for a period from three months to three years, i.e., imprisonment for a period from three months to three years (paragraphs 4 and 5). As for the criminal offence of unauthorized manufacture, supply, sale, keeping or making available to other person special devices, means, computer programs or computer data, the premeditated commitment of the offence referred to in paragraph 1, a fine or penalty for a period of up to one year shall apply (paragraph 6). An attempt for the aforesaid criminal offences is also punishable (paragraph 7). Special devices, means, computer programs or data for committing the criminal offence shall be confiscated (paragraph 8). 
(d) Compensation for right holders referred to in the LCRR, applies in case of violation of the intellectual property rights. Article 156 regulates the protection of the rights and compensation for it, Article 157 provides that in cases when there are several holders, each of them may demand a complete protection, and in case that there are several perpetrators, each of them shall be deemed completely responsible, and Article 161; the Law on Industrial Property with Articles 201 paragraph 1, 211 and 216 provide that compensation for the damage shall be estimated in accordance with the general regulations of damage compensation  related to material and immaterial damage and a civil penalty. 
(e) Penal provisions of Articles 168 and 169 of the LCRR provide that offences committed shall be punished to a fine with regards to legal entities (amounting from 34.000 MKD to 300.000 MKD). The person in charge of the legal entity and/or the individual independent business activity or profession shall be fined from 1.700 MKD to 50.000 MKD. The natural entity shall be fined to a fine amounting from 1.000 MKD to 50.000 MKD. The protection measure of suspension from performing the business activity for a period from 3 months to 1 year and protection measure of confiscation of the illegally created objects or objects used for creation of illegal objects shall also be pronounced. According to the Article 228 of the Law on Industrial Property infringer of industrial property rights, depends upon the infringement, shall be fined from 10.000 MKD to 300.000 MKD. In such cases the protection measure of suspension from performing the business activity for a period from 6 months to 1 year shall also be pronounced. 
(f) A right holder may demand from the court to order confiscation and destruction of products manufactured or in sale - Article 201 paragraph 2 of the Law on Industrial Property. The illegal products and wrapping material thereof or the production and other subjects of protection (e.g. matrixes, negatives, molds, panels or other means used for perpetrating the violation) shall be destroyed or remanufactured, the equipment intended to be used for violation of the rights referred to in the LCRR, i.e. in Article 159 paragraph 1 items 1, 2 and 3 and paragraph 3 thereof shall be destroyed or remanufactured, and it may be required that the illegal products or means are ceded. Moreover, pursuant to Article 259 of the Law on Execution of Sanctions (“Official Gazette of RM” No. 3/97), an enforceable decision pronouncing security measure of confiscation of objects being used or intended to be used for committing of a criminal act, or created as result of committing a criminal act, shall be enforced by the court in accordance with the law and in a way determined in the decision. (g) There are no sufficient or sufficiently trained human resources available for the administration of the LCRR. Namely, the Sector for Administrative and Supervision Affairs and Control at the Ministry of Culture, being competent for the supervision and inspection, exercises its authority under rather unfavorable conditions regarding organization, human resources and technical equipment. The work of the Sector is organized in two Units with a total of 8 possible executors, 3 positions being full time employees and the others vacant. The duties of the vacant positions are performed by outsourcing free lancers due to the obligation for restrictive policy in new employments. The Act for Systematization of Posts of the State Office of Industrial Property foresees 50 civil servants, a director and deputy director. At the moment only 23 civil servants are employed. The aim of drawing the Act for Internal Organization and Work of the State Office of Industrial Property which has been enforced as of 20.06.2004, was to increase the specialization of the experts in particular fields. For achieving more appropriate, more suitable and continuous specialization of human resources in particular fields the State Office of Industrial Property develops annual program for training of human resources.  The period determined for the procedures depends on the complexity of each particular case. Civil proceedings last from 6 months to 3 years. With regards to the average duration of court proceedings, the court proceedings regarding offences are usually done within two years before they become obsolete. One of the reasons for relatively long proceedings is the lack of specialized departments at the courts and insufficiently developed court practices in this field. This imposes the need to establish specialized departments at the courts, modify the existing regulations appropriately and organize training and seminars for the judges. 
(h) For the purpose of raising the level of efficacy regarding the implementation of the regime for exercising and protecting copyright and related rights, the following measures are planned: Human resources: the current coverage of supervision and control of all elements subject to control is poor. The plan to overcome this problem is by increasing the number of executors and filling the existing vacant positions at the competent Sector for Inspection at the Ministry of Culture; Training of human resources: There is an urgent and pressing need for technical assistance in professional training of the inspectors regarding new inspection techniques as well as permanent training in this field of the other public authorities competent for the implementation of the regulations provided for in this field; The Action Plan for the European Partnership for 2004 includes the following: the Republic of Macedonia has determined the tasks for implementation of activities with the purpose to put into effect the Program for Promotion and Implementation of the Regime of Effectuation and  Protection of the Copyright and Related Rights and  Education and Sensibility including an Analysis of the Situation and Proposal short-term and long-term Measures and Activities of  the Coordination Body for Copyright and Related Rights. The objective of this Program is to draw action plans for undertaking more effective measures targeted at coordinated approach of work of the competent inspection authorities. This will also be supported by the Action Plan for Effective Implementation for the Protection of Copyright and Related Rights in the Republic of Macedonia; Improve inter-departmental cooperation: Draw an appropriate Action Plan for improving inter-departmental cooperation to the end of consistent and coordinated work of the competent bodies in this field, including inspection authorities; Raise public awareness: In order to improve the awareness of the need to protect copyrights and related rights it is necessary to create a web portal and web page, make campaigns on  the significance of copy right protection and undertake other similar measures to raise public awareness, build capacities  and provide necessary technical equipment etc. The Law on Industrial Property provides that the State Office of Industrial Property  shall cooperate with the other state bodies, legal and natural entities and citizens’ associations in the field of industrial property, with other foreign offices, except if otherwise provided by law for the cases of certain exchange of information. In the Action Program for 2005 the State Office of Industrial Property provides cooperation with all the subjects involved in the system of industrial property rights protection, including the Ministry of Interior, the Ministry of Justice, the Customs Authority, the State Market Inspectorate and the Commission for Protection of Competition. The possibility to regulate by law the work of the State Market Inspectorate competent for confiscating infringed goods in sales is being considered in official meetings. There is a draft Project of the European Agency for Reconstruction for network communication with all the subjects involved in the system of the enforcement of the intellectual property rights protection. 
B. Copyright and Related Rights (Intellectual Property Rights) 

1. Does your country provide for protection of semiconductors? If yes, do you consider this protection to be in conformity with Directive 87/54/EEC? 
The Republic of Macedonia provides protection of semiconductors by virtue of the Law on Protection of Topographies of Integrated Circuits dated 22.01.1998 (“Official Gazette of RM” No. 5/98). The aforesaid Law entered in the force on 08.02.1998. The Law is compliant to Directive 87/54/EEC. 
2. Does your country provide for a rental right, lending right and the provisions on certain related rights set out in Directive 92/100/EEC? a) If YES, please give full references and the principal contents of your legislation. Does the legislation notably provide for an unwaivable right to equitable remuneration for rental where an author or performer has transferred or assigned his rental right concerning a phonogram or an original copy of a film to a phonogram or film producer? Does your legislation provide that at least authors obtain a remuneration for public lending? Does it provide for a derogation from the exclusive public lending right and if so, would this be in line with the Directive? Does your legislation provide that a single equitable remuneration is paid by the user to the relevant performers and phonogram producers every time a phonogram published for commercial purposes is used for broadcasting by wireless means or for any communication to the public? b) If NO, do you plan to adopt legislation on the protection of rental rights, lending rights and related rights? Please give details and dates. 
The Law on Copyright and Related Rights (“Official Gazette of RM” No. 47/96, 3/98 and 98/02) regulates the rental right and other related rights included in EU Directive 92/100/EEC, but not the lending right.  
)  The Law on Copyright and Related Rights (hereinafter referred to as the ‘LCRR’), regulates the rental right and other rights connected to the related rights, without the lending right. Therefore the LCRR is not completely harmonised with the aforesaid Directive. Article 2, item 6 of the LCRR defines the rental right, i.e. providing of an original or a copy of a copyright work / subject matter of a related right to be used for a limited period of time for direct or indirect economic benefit. As for the rights of the authors, the system of exclusivity of rights, including the right to rental (Article 19 of the LCRR) has been adopted. In the context of audio-visual copyright works, when signing contracts for film production and audio-visual adaptation, a film producer shall be transferred all the exclusive economic rights (presumption of transfer) by the authors, but the authors retain the right of equitable remuneration  for each rental and they may not waive the aforesaid right. The right to rental also refers to the use of a computer programme. In accordance with Article 111 of the LCRR, the artist - performer (hereinafter referred to as the ‘performer’) has an exclusive right to: broadcasting (hereinafter referred to as : the broadcasting) of the performance, except  where the performance is a broadcast by itself or it is a broadcast from a fixation; public  transmission of the live performance by technical means out of the space or place of performance, fixation of the live performance; reproduction and distribution of phonograms and videograms with fixed performances, as well as rental. Presumption of the transferability of the right to fixation, reproduction, distribution and rental with regards to the performance is provided for phonogram and film producers, however the performers retain the right of equitable remuneration for each rental and they may not waive the aforesaid right (Article 113 of the LCRR). he right to reproduction, distribution and rental is an exclusive right of a phonogram producer (Article 118 of the LCRR). Single equitable remuneration is provided for a phonogram producer and the performer for broadcasting or other communication to the public of phonograms published for commercial purposes or its reproduction. The remuneration is distributed to the aforesaid subjects in a ratio of 50 % in case when there is no written contract for distribution signed. The right to reproduction, distribution and public presentation is an exclusive right of the film producer (Article 122 of the LCRR). Broadcasting organisations (hereinafter referred to as  organisations) have the exclusive right to: re-broadcasting the programmes thereof and  broadcasting via satellite; transmitting   programmes at public places, against payment of an admission charge; fixation as well as reproduction and distribution  of the fixations on broadcasting  programmes and other similar rights (Article 129 of the LCRR).  The LCRR does not regulate the lending right as an exclusive right or a right to remuneration lending, and therefore, it does not regulate the right to public lending, including the right to remuneration to authors of public lending at least. b)   The Law Amending the Law on Copyright and Related Rights (“Official Gazette of RM” No.04/05), (hereinafter referred to as LALCRR’), was adopted for the purposes of complete harmonisation with the EU Directives. To the end of harmonisation with the aforesaid Directives, and to meet the needs of the Questionnaire on the limitations and exemptions with regards to copyright and related rights (hereinafter referred to as Questionnaire’), the Question regarding Directive 2001/29/EC, i.e. the so called Information Directive, shall be answered integrally.  With regards to complete harmonisation with the aforesaid Directive, the LALCRR defines also the lending right - use of an original or a copy of a copyright work and/or subject matters of related rights for a limited period of time with direct or indirect economic benefit in cases when the aforesaid right is being exercised by an institution open to public. At the same time, the definition of the right to distribution completes the definition that each form of transfer of possession (rental and lending), is also considered distribution. Consequently, the exclusive rights of the right holders (authors, performers, phonogram producers, film producers etc.) define only the right to distribution including the right to rental and/or the corresponding lending right . For the regime of right to exhaustion, i.e. (for more details see 5_III_A_ _7).  LALCRR also provides provisions concerning the lending right according to which the author has the right to an equitable remuneration for the lending, after the exhaustion of the right to distribution. At the same time, the lending right does not apply to architectural works and original and copies of the applied arts and design. The following public institutions are exempted from payment of remuneration: Libraries for originals or copies of written works or copies of phonograms; galleries and museums for originals and copies of visual works of art or photographs and film libraries and educational institutions for originals or copies of videograms with fixed cinematography and other audio-visual works. Moreover, remuneration shall not be paid when inter-lending among public institutions, i.e., other non-profit organisations take place. Thus, the harmonisation with the Articles 4 and 5 of the aforesaid Directive has been achieved. Presumption of transfer referred to in the provisions of the LALCRR for copyright works created in the course of employment; apply only to labour contracts regarding film production.  Economical and other rights belong to the employee-author after five (5) years, and the employer has the right to demand new exclusive transfer thereof in case he/she pays the employee-author equitable remuneration for every type of economical right. Notwithstanding presumption or non-presumption of the right to rental with regards to copyright works created in the course of employment;, the authors are entitled to the right to equitable remuneration for each rental. Provisions of the LALCRR concerning equitable remuneration upon contracts for film production and audio-visual adaptations are improved and apply to the right to equitable remuneration by the film producer for every use of the audio-visual works including rental thereof. As for the rights of the performers, Article 113 of the LCRR has been corrected by virtue of the LALCRR by means of two separate articles providing that the presumption for transfer of the rights (fixation, reproduction and distribution, including rental) applies only to contracts regarding film production, and as for contracts for production of phonograms, performers are retained to the right to remuneration for each economical right transferred. In both types of contracts, performers are retained to the right of equitable remuneration for each use of the works including rental thereof, and they may not waive the aforesaid right.  Provisions regarding phonogram producers, film producers and radio and TV organisation are improved nomo-technically and with regards to style harmonised with the Directive, regulating the rights thereof in accordance with the other Directives. Pursuant to the LALCRR, the user is obliged to pay the phonogram producer an equitable remuneration for every use as a single sum for the rights of the phonogram producer and the performer in case when a phonogram is published for commercial purposes or a reproduction thereof is used directly or indirectly for public transmission, broadcasting or rebroadcasting.  Phonogram producers shall pay the phonogram performers a half of the remuneration, unless this Law determine otherwise. At the same time, a phonogram made available to the public with consent by the phonogram producer shall be deemed to be published for commercial purposes and shall be used under the aforesaid conditions. It may be concluded that the adoption of the Law Amending the Law on Copyright and Related Rights (“Official Gazette of RM” No.04/05) is completely harmonised with the aforesaid Directive. 
3. Is the term of protection of copyright and related rights in your country in conformity with Directive 93/98/EEC? If NO, how and by when do you intend to align your legislation with this directive? 
Directive 93/98/EEC was transposed in the Law on Copyright and Related Rights (“Official Gazette of RM” No. 47/96, 3/9 and 98/02) when it was adopted in 1996, The Law was harmonized with this Directive, however not completely. The terms of duration were fully harmonized for:  the protection of authors (during their lifetime and 70 years after their death), including the terms with regards to anonymous and pseudonymous works; the beginning of duration of the terms (1of January in the year following the event is considered as the base for the calculation of terms) etc.; protection of the performers (50 years after the date of performance, in case when the fixation of the performance was first lawfully published or lawfully communicated to the public during the aforesaid period, the rights shall be valid for 50 years after the date of the first legal disclosure); protection of phonogram producers (50 years after the date the fixation was made , and if the phonogram was lawfully published for the first time during that period, the rights shall be valid for 50 years after the date of such publication. In cases when the phonogram was not lawfully published during the aforesaid period, but was lawfully communicated to the public, the rights shall be valid for 50 years, from the date of such communication to the public); protection of film producers (valid for 50 years from the date of completion of the fixation, and in cases when the videogram was lawfully published or communicated to the public for the first time, the rights shall be valid for 50 years from the date of the first legal disclosure; and protection of the rights of broadcasting (valid for 50 years from the date of the first broadcast). Provisions regarding terms of duration of the protection of audio-visual works were not harmonised. In the Law Amending the Law on Copyright and Related Rights (“Official Gazette of RM” No.04/05), (hereinafter referred to as ‘LALCRR’), the Article stipulating the terms for protection of the audio-visual works in the Law on Copyright and Related Rights (hereinafter referred to as the ‘LCRR’) is deleted, and in the Article related to the terms for the protection of co-authors, the terms of protection of audio-visual works are provided, so that the term shall be calculated or shall begin to endure with the death of the last person alive, independently of the fact whether they are deemed to be the authors of the work or authors of contributions to the work in accordance with the LCRR as follows: the principal director, the author of the screenplay, the author of the dialogue and the composer of music specially created for use in the cinematography or  other audio-visual work.  
Other Terms of Protection 
Terms of the protection of disclosure of the previously unpublished works in the public domain, as well as publication of scientific and critical commentaries and reviews on previously disclosed in the public domain are also stipulated by the LCRR, but not sufficiently harmonised with the aforesaid Directive. LALCRR stipulates that a publisher who for publishes for the first time lawfully or an entity, who / whish communicates to the public for the first time, a still undisclosed copyright work in `which the copyright has expired, shall enjoy protection equal to the economical rights of the author determined by this Law (rights are valid for 25 years from the date of the first lawfully publication or the first lawfully communication to the public). A physical entity creating a scientific or critical comment or a review on a previously disclosure copyright work whose copyright has expired, shall enjoy protection equal to the economical rights of the author determined by this Law (rights are valid for 25 years from the date of the first lawfully publication). Pursuant to the LALCRR, in cases when until the date of entering into force of the Law, the users have utilised lawfully the copyright works and the subject matters of related rights whose protection has expired until the date of entering into force of the Law, the aforesaid works, i.e., subject matters of related rights shall not enjoy the protection in accordance to the Law.  A complete harmonisation with the aforesaid Directive is achieved by virtue of the Law Amending the Law on Copyright and Related Rights (“Official Gazette of RM” No.04/05). 
4. Does your copyright law provide for the legal protection of computer programs? a) If YES, is it fully compatible with Directive 91/250/EC, including with the provisions of this directive on authorship, restricted acts, exceptions to the restricted acts, decompilation and special measures of protection? b) If NO, do you plan to adopt any legislation in this field? Please give details and dates. 
A whole section of a separate chapter is treating special provisions for computer programs in the Law on Copyright and Related Rights (“Official Gazette of RM” No. 47/96, 3/98 and 98/02). he aforesaid section is basically harmonised with Directive 91/250/EEC. Nevertheless, during further evaluation, some nomo-technical impreciseness consequently leading to incomplete harmonisation with the Directive has been established. With the Law Amending the Law on Copyright and Related Rights (“Official Gazette of RM” No.04/05), hereinafter referred to as the ‘LALCRR’, the aforesaid non-reconciliation has been eliminated. Therefore, provisions regarding computer programs created under commissioning copyright contract have been deleted from the LALCRR.  Pursuant to the LALCRR, authors of programs have exclusive economical rights to use the program and to authorise or prohibit use of the programs for the following purposes: reproduction, as well as loading, displaying, running, transmission, or storage of the computer programs, in cases when the aforesaid activities require such a reproduction; translation, adaptation or any other alteration, as well as reproducing of the results of that alteration, without prejudice to the rights of the person performing the aforesaid alteration and distribution of the originals of computer programs or copies in any form. Provisions concerning exhaustion of the right to distribution shall apply also in cases of distribution of the original or copies of a computer program. Pursuant to the LALCRR, unless otherwise provided by contract, a legal user of a computer program may reproduce or perform any other processing referred to in the previous paragraph, including correction of errors necessary for running the program in accordance with the purpose thereof and with regards to the activities referred to in the previous paragraph, without authorisation from the author.  legal user may also reproduce, without authorisation from the author, a maximum of two copies of the program, one of which is reserve copy in case of necessary use. Also, the legal user of the copy of a computer program may observe, study or test the functioning of the program without an authorisation from the author in order to determine the ideas which are basic characteristic of any element of the program, if he does so while performing any of the activities of loading, displaying, running, transmission or storage of the program that he is entitled to perform. Pursuant to the LALCRR, as for the reproduction of the code and alteration of its form, while exercising the right to reproduction, i.e., while exercising the right to any other alteration stated above, authorisation by the author is not necessary if it is made for the purpose of obtaining information aimed at achieving interoperability of an independently created computer program with other programs, upon the following conditions: the aforesaid activities to be carried out by the licensee or on their behalf, for that purpose, by a person authorized to do so: the information necessary for achieving interoperability was previously available to the aforesaid persons, and if these activities are confined only to the parts of the original program which are necessary to achieve interoperability. It is not permitted that the information necessary for achieving interoperability referred to in the previous sentence are: used for other purposes except for achieving interoperability of independently created computer programs; to be given to third parties, except when necessary for achieving interoperability of the independently created computer programs and to be used for developing, production or marketing of computer programs substantially similar in expression, or for any other act which infringes copyright. The aforesaid provisions may not apply in the way which may unreasonably prejudice the copyright or are in conflict with the normal use of the computer program. The LALCRR is completely corrected with regards to the fact that it shall also be considered that a person infringed the exclusive rights, when the person knew or could be in a possibility to know that it distributed or possessed  illegal copies of a computer program for commercial purposes. The LALCRR contains a provision concerning the connection of relevant provisions on technological measures for the protection of computer programs, (for more details see 05_III_B_ _7).  It may be concluded that by means of the aforesaid corrections of the already transposed Directive into the basic text of the Law on Copyright and Related Rights, complete harmonisation with EU legislation has been achieved. 5. Does your copyright law provide for the legal protection of databases? a) If YES, is it fully compatible with Directive 96/9/EC, including on scope of protection, protection under copyright and sui generis protection? b) If NO, do you plan to adopt legislation on the legal protection of databases (including sui generis protection)? Please give details and dates. 
The Law on Copyright and Related Rights (“Official Gazette of RM” No. 47/96, 3/98 and 98/02), (hereinafter referred to as the ‘LCRR’) stipulates only provisions on copyright databases, i.e. collections which meet criteria for copyright works according to selection, purpose or arrangement of contents. However, there is no provision regarding exceptions and limitations of their data abase. This is not in compliance with Directive 96/9/EC. Directive 96/9/EC is transposed in the Law Amending the Law on Copyright and Related Rights (“Official Gazette of RM” No.04/05), (hereinafter referred to as the ‘LALCRR’). Thus, the LALCRR introduces a definition of database using elements stated in the Directive and equally referring to as copyright databases and databases with 'sui generis' protection. About the provision on the exceptions and limitations for copyright databases. (for more details see 05_III_B_ _7A particular sub-section determines the rights of the maker of database with ‘sui generis’ protection as a particular type of related rights. An exclusive right of the maker of database with 'sui generis' protection is introduced in cases when he/she has presented that substantial quality and/or quantity investment is made in the database. The LALCRR determines the scope of protection, total, essential and non-essential parts of the database contents. The LALCRR stipulates the types of use: extraction and re-utilization, in correlation with the types of use referred to in LCRR. With the first sale of a copy of a database with 'sui generis' protection the right to control the further sale is exhausted, while public lending is not an act of utilisation. The LALCRR defines the rights of the lawful user in detail - the scope of the legally permitted utilization by the lawful user - the maker of disclosed database shall not prevent a lawful user from utilization the insubstantial parts of the contents thereof, evaluated with regards to quality and/or quantity for any purposes. In cases when a lawful user is authorised to utilise only part of the database, the aforesaid paragraph shall apply only for that part. A lawful user of a disclosed database shall not undertake any activities contrary to the normal use and/or in unreasonable degree prejudice the legal interests of the maker of a database. The lawful user of a disclosed database shall not cause damage to the right holder of the copyright or related rights with regards to works or subject matters of related rights of the aforesaid database. The LALCRR stipulates specific cases of free use of databases with ‘sui generis’ protection: extraction of parts of non-electronic database for private purposes; extraction of parts due to illustration for teaching purposes or scientific research, in case when the source is indicated and to the extend justified by non- commercial purposes, and extraction and/or re-utilisation of parts for the purposes of public security, in administrative and judicial proceedings. The LALCRR refers to the particular term of duration and calculation of the database protection period mentioned above: 15 years after completion of the making of the database, and in case it has been legally disclosed, 15 years from the date of its first such disclosure. Article 51 of the LCRR stipulates the method of estimating the protection period (1 January in the year following the event is the base for calculation of terms) shall be applied adequate to the 'sui generis' protection. The term of duration for protection shall start to endure from the beginning, with any substantial change evaluated with regards to quality and/or quantity, to the database contents including any substantial change resulting from the accumulation of successive additions, deletions or alteration, qualifying the database as an substantially new investment, evaluated with regards to quality or quantity.  The LALCRR applies to the protection of databases with ‘sui generis’ protection, if 15 years have passed since their completion is made on the day of entering into force of this Law. The provision referred to in Article 10 paragraph 3 of Directive 93/98/EEC applies also to the databases with the ‘sui generis’ protection. With this the Law Amending the Law on Copyright and Related Rights is fully compatible with the aforesaid Directive. 
6. Does your copyright legislation provide for the legal protection of copyright and related rights in conformity with Directive 2001/29/EC? 
Several articles of the Law on Copyright and Related Rights (“Official Gazette of RM” No. 47/96, 3/98 and 98/02), arise from or may be legally interpreted regarding the scope of the provisions of WIPO treaties: the WIPO Copyright Treaty and the WIPO Performances and Phonograms Treaty i.e., the aforesaid Directive 2001/29/EC. However, most of the articles of the Law on Copyright and Related Rights  (hereinafter referred to as the ‘LCRR’) are compatible with the provisions of the Directive only partially or do not consistently correspond to it in correlation with each other as a whole, i.e., they are not in complete compliance with it, e.g. provisions regarding the exceptions and limitations of the rights in relation to the right to reproduction; provisions regarding technological measures for protection which do not stipulate all the elements etc. Also, the LCRR does not refer to the exclusive right for making available to the public and the protection of rights-management information.  A complete harmonization with the Directive has been achieved by virtue of the Law Amending the Law on Copyright and Related Rights (“Official Gazette of RM” No.04/05).  For the process of transposing the Directive in the provisions of the ‘LCRR’ it is already answered (for more details see 05_III_B_ _7). 
7. If YES, is it fully compatible with the listed exclusive rights of authors and certain neighbouring rightholders? Does your legislation provide, in particular, for a right of communication to the public of works and a right of making available to the public other subject-matter? Does it provide for the mandatory exception for “temporary copies” (Article 5.1)? Does it provide for other exceptions? If yes, can you list them? Does your country provide for a system of fair compensation to rightholders for the following: reprography, reproductions made by a natural person for private use, reproductions of broadcasts made by social institutions pursuing non-commercial purposes? Does your legislation provide for the legal protection of technological measures and rights management information? What sanctions and remedies does your legislation provide in respect of infringements of the rights and obligations set out in Directive 2001/29/EC? 
By virtue of the Law Amending the Law on Copyright and Related Rights (“Official Gazette of RM” No.04/05), (hereinafter referred to as the ‘LALCRR"), the following definition of the right to reproduction has been modified and amended:  making a copy of a copyright work or of its part, fixed on a material medium, directly or indirectly, temporary or permanently, regardless of the type of the medium of the copy, the number of copies and the manufacturing procedure. The definition has been introduced referring to the right of making available to the public-, individual use of an original or a copy of a copyright work being accessible to the public, by a wireless or a wire means, from the place and at the time chosen by the user himself/herself. he right to making available to the public is incorporated in all legal provisions related to their exercising by the right holders as an exclusive right- authors of copyright works, including audiovisual works; performers of their fixed performances; or phonogram producers with regards to their phonograms; for film producers for their audiovisual fixations: for broadcasting organisations with regards to their broadcasts, including cable re-broadcast;  for makers of databases with ‘sui generis’ protection  (re-utilization includes making available to the public). Provisions referring to exemptions and limitations have been revised completely so that they are harmonized with the Directive, and also new types of lawfully permitted use with remuneration such as legal licences and lawfully permitted use without remuneration as a free use, which have not been regulated by the Law on Copyright and Related Rights (“Official Gazette of RM” No. 47/96, 3/98 and 98/02), have been introduced in accordance with the aforesaid Directive. Thus, in line with the LALCRR, temporary reproduction of copyright works, i.e., subject matters of the related rights of transient or incidental nature, being integral and essential part of the technological process without independant economic significance in itself, but with the sole purpose to enable transmission in a network among third parties through an intermediary and authorised use in accordance with the provisions of the Law on Copyright and Related Rights (hereinafter referred to as the ‘LCRR’). In this way LALCRR is harmonised with Article 5 paragraph 1 of the Directive. As for the part referring to exceptions and limitations the provisions regarding lawfully permitted use with remuneration as legal licences, the LALCRR regulates the following: 1.  Reproduction of copyright works, in textbooks, reading books and other publications of a similar nature  partially, or completely when they refer to short copyright works and works in the field of photography, fine and applied art, architecture, design and cartography, intended only for the purpose of illustration in teaching for non-commercial goals; and complete reproduction of articles in daily and periodical publications, as well as comments in broadcastings on issues of common interest in the field of economics, politics, religion, art, science etc., with the exception when the use is explicitly reserved by the author. The aforesaid use applies correspondingly to communication to the public.  2.  Reproduction of copyright works is limited to three copies by the physical entity for private use, for purposes which are not commercial, neither directly or directly. The aforesaid reproduction does not refer to the scope of the whole work but as follows: for literary works, except when the circulation has been exhausted before the end of two years; for graphic publication of a music work, except by manual transcript; for databases in non-electronic form; and for architectural works, unless otherwise provided by this Law or as provided by the contract. s for the legal licences, the right to an equitable remuneration is obligatory. The LALCRR contains more detailed provisions referring to the right to an equitable remuneration for private copying (for types of reprographing, the obligation for remuneration payment, and the volume and amount of the remuneration determined by the Government of the Republic of Macedonia etc.). Pursuant to the LALCRR, the aforesaid provisions shall be applied after the expiry of three (3) years from entering into force of this Law. The reason behind is the lack of infrastructure of associations for collecting management of copyright and related rights (there is only one association for collecting management of copyright - the association of non-scenic musical works). Provisions on the lawfully permitted use without remuneration as a free use are also corrected or modified and amended. They refer to: 1.  the reproduction and communication to the public of reports on daily events or public political speeches and excerpts from public speeches and lectures or similar works by public, religious and other authorities;  2.  the public performance of copyright works for illustration in direct non-commercial teaching and in non-commercial school performances, if the participants do not get remuneration for it; than reproduction and public presentation of broadcasted copyright works for illustration of direct non-commercial teaching, as well as public performances of copyright works in charity events, if the participants do not get remuneration for it;   3.  the reproduction in up to three copies of the copyright work, without commercial goals for: scientific purposes, in the scope appropriate to the purpose of the use and for use by individuals with special needs, if the use is directly connected to the needs, while the reproduction is related to works correspondingly determined, is regulated in the same manner as in the provisions referring to private copying in the LALCRR;  4.  the reproduction for own use by public non-profit institutions (archives, libraries, film libraries, museums, other cultural, educational, scientific and similar institutions), under the condition that the reproductions are made by means of own copy or a copy belonging to other similar institutions for the purpose of preservation and protection of works, while the reproduction is related to works determined by the LALCRR; and communication to the public or making available to the public the works for research or personal analysis through restricted terminals of the aforesaid institutions, under the condition that the works are part of the collection of the institution and that they are not for sale or they are not subject to authorisation;  5.  Quotes from a copyright work in a scope corresponding to the purpose and aim of  use, i.e., explaining, illustration, polemics and instruction;  6.  Use of a copyright work which is not of essential significance with regards to the purpose of any object during its utilisation as an auxiliary element; 7.  Private or other own modification, which is not intended for the public and is inaccessible for the public, its processing into parody or caricature, if it does not lead to confusion as to the source of the work and modification during the permitted use, when the opposition of the author to the modification is contrary to the principles of consciousness and honesty;  8.  Use of databases which are copyright works or their copies, may be freely reproduced, modified, distributed or communicated to the public in whatsoever manner or reproduced, and distributed, or otherwise communicated to the public  in whatsoever manner the results of the modification activities of the aforesaid collection, if this is necessary for the access to the contents and their normal use;  9.  Use of copyright works for display in public exhibitions, sales, auctions, fairs etc. in the scope necessary for advertising these events by means of catalogues and other forms by their organiser, excluding any other commercial use;  10. Use of copyright works permanently displayed in parks, streets, squares or other public places, except when the use is in a three dimensional form and for the same purpose as the original, achieving commercial goals;  11. Use of works in architectural constructions or in the form of sketches or plans of architectural works for the purpose of their reconstruction;  12. Use of a copyright work for the purposes of public security, for arbitration, judicial, administrative or other public authorities, in the scope necessary for presenting evidence, reaching decisions, their elaboration and publication, and during religious gatherings or celebrations of public holidays;  13.  Use of a copyright work in the scope necessary for the control of performance during the production or sale of phonograms and videograms, devices for their reproduction or communication to the public, and  equipment for program reception, during the production process and sale;  14. Use of expressions of folklore by referring to the source and the origin of the work. The provisions regarding technological measures for copyright protection, free use of technological measures in correlation with the provisions for limitations and exemptions, and referring to rights-management information, have been harmonized with the LALCRR. Thus, it is considered that a person has infgringed the exclusive rights referred to in the LALCRR when he knew or he could be in a possibility to know that is performing actions to circumvent the technological measures aimed to protection of rights referred to in this Law. Also, it is  considered that any person has infringed the exclusive rights referred to in this Law  in cases of manufacture, import, distribution, sale, rental, advertisement for sale or rental, or possession for commercial purposes of devices, products and their component parts, or providing services with regards to whatever effective technological measures which: are promoted, advertised or marketed for the purpose of circumvention, and have only limited commercially significant purpose or use, except for circumvent, and are primarly designed, produced, adapted or performed for the purpose to enable or facilitate circumvention. In accordance with the LALCRR, technological measures include any technology, device or their component parts, which during their normal operation are designed for prevention or restriction of infringement of the rights determined by the Law. The aforesaid measures are deemed to be effective in case when the use of the copyright works, the subject matters of the related rights or the databases with  'sui generis’ protection, is controlled by the right holders with the purpose to provide protection by means of application of controlled access, by means of protecting the process (such as coding, scrambling or other type of transformation of the works or the subject matters of the related rights), as well as by means of mechanisms for control of copying.  The right holder using technological measures is obliged to enable attainment of the rights without delay and as soon as possible, on demand of persons having lawful access to copyright works, subject matters of related rights and databases with ‘sui generis’ protection, if they are legally permmited to use them with remuneration, such as legal licences, and in case of legally permmited use without remuneration such as free use of economical rights determined by this Law, by means of removal of the technological measures or by other means, for the following purposes: use for the purposes of teaching, reproduction in written format for private use; reproduction in written format for scientific purposes; use for the needs of individuals with special needs; reproduction for own use by non-profit institutions, such as libraries, film libraries, museums and other cultural, educational and scientific institutions, use for the pruposes of public security, as well as in arbitration, judicial, administrative and other bodies; reproduction of ephemeral recordings created by broadcasting organisations; using the rights of a computer program and using the rights of databases with ‘sui generis’ protection. The aforesaid provisions do not apply when the obligations under contracts for application of technological measures, including contracts for the right of making  available to the public, concluded between right holders and users of the copyright works, subject matters of related rights and databases subject to ‘sui generis’ protection, are met.  It is considered that any person infinges the exclusive economical rights in cases when knowingly and  without authorisation is carrying out: removal or alteration of any electronic rights- management information; reproduction, distribution, import for distribution, rental or communication to the public a copyright work or a subject matter of related rights, whose electronic rights-management information  have been removed or altered, while he/she knew or could be in a possibility to know that he/she induces, enables, facilitates or conceals an  infringement of the right. Rights-management information is the information provided by the right holders which lead to the identification of the copyright works, subject matters of related rights, databases with 'sui generis’ protection, authors, other right holders, terms and conditions for their use, as well as their appropriate numbers and codes, presented by this information. The aforesaid provisions referred to in the Chapter on ‘Protection of the Rights’ and all the provisions regarding judicial protection and misdemeanour protection referred to in the LCRR, as well as Article 157 of the Penal Code (“Official Gazette of RM” No. 37/96, 4/02, 43/03, 19/04), refer to their protection respectively. (for more details see 05_III_A_ _8By virtue of the aforesaid, the Law Amending the Law on Copyright and Related Rights is completely harmonized with the aforesaid Directive as well as with the other Directives referring to this field, with regards to exemptions and limitations referred to in the Law on Copyright and Related Rights. 
8. Does your copyright law provide for a resale right for the benefit of the author of an original work of art? a If YES, is it fully compatible with Directive 2001/84/EC? b If NO, do you plan to adopt any legislation in this field? Please give details and dates. 

a)  Article 21 of the Law on Copyright and Related Rights (“Official Gazette of  RM” No. 47/96,3/98 and 98/02) regulates the resale royalty right for the authors of original artistic works, according to which, in cases when the original of the fine art work or the original of a literary or a musical work (manuscript) is sold or disposed of in some other way, the author is entitled to the right to be informed and remunerated with 3 % of the retail price of every subsequent sale. The author is to be informed about data on titles of the works disposed of, data on the owner and agent, the retail price, and the right of the author to inspection of the documents containing the aforesaid data. The owner is responsible for notifying the author, and in a case when the disposition has been made through a gallery, organisation of a public sale or other agent, the aforesaid entities have joint responsibility towards the owner of the work of art. The aforesaid right may not be subject to cancellation, disposition or judicial execution. Pursuant to Article 139 paragraph 2, the aforesaid right is subject to obligatory collecting management. Pursuant to Article 148 paragraph 4, the right of the competent association to a collecting management shall be attained under the Law and not depending on whether a contract with the author has been signed.    The Law on Copyright and Related Rights (hereinafter referred to as the ‘LCRR’) is not completely harmonized with the aforesaid Directive 2001/84/EC. 

b)  
By virtue of the Law Amending the Law on Copyright and Related Rights (“Official Gazette of RM” No.04/05), (hereinafter referred to as the “LALCRR”), a complete harmonization with the aforesaid Directive is ensured. The aforesaid provisions are already into force with the adoption of the LALCRR, but not later than 2010 as provided by the Directive. To the end of harmonization with the Directive, the LALCRR provides a definition of an ‘original of artistic work’ in the sense of the Directive, as a work of visual, graphic or plastic art, such as: pictures, collages, paintings, drawings, graphics, engravings, lithographies, sculptures, ceramics, carvings, tapestries, glassware, and photographs and works created during procedures similar to photographing, as well as copies of the aforesaid works deemed to be originals. Copies of the aforesaid works created by the author him/herself or made with his/her consent in a limited number shall be considered originals, and they are usually numerated and signed by the author, or appropriately approved in some other way by the author.  The remuneration of the author related to the resale royalty right shall be determined according to the rates referred to in the Directive, as follows:    4% of the sale price up to 50.000 EUR;    3% of the sale price from 50.000,01 EUR to 200.000 EUR;    1% of the sale price from 200.000,01 EUR to 350.000 EUR;    0,5% of the sale price for the part of the price from 350.000,01 EUR to  500.000 EUR and    0,5% of the sale price with regards to the part of the price above 500.000 EUR. All the amounts are expressed in MKD counter value based on the middle rate of the National Bank of the Republic of Macedonia on the date of sale.   sale price is the net value without taxes calculated. he highest amount of remuneration cannot be higher than 12.500 EUR in MKD counter value. The remuneration shall be paid by the sales person, i.e., the gallerist, the organiser of a public sale, art gallery or other agent organizing the sale of works of art. The author, his/her successors or the associations for collecting management are entitled to the right to require information necessary for providing payment of remuneration for the resale, within three years from date of the sale of the copyright work, particularly with regards to: the titles of the disposed works, the author and the agent, the sale contracts, the sale price etc. The remainder of the regime for collecting management of the LALCRR has remained the same as referred to in the existing LCRR, and the provision for delivery of information has been appropriately adjusted. Pursuant to the LALCRR when an original (manuscript) of a literary or music work has been sold or disposed of some other way, his/her author is entitled to the right to be notified and be remunerated with 3 % of the sale price, expressed as a net value without taxes calculated, from each subsequent sale.  Thus the aforesaid amendments and modifications shall achieve a complete harmonization of the Law on Copyright and Related Rights with the aforesaid Directive. 
9. Has your country adhered to the two WIPO Treaties of 1996 (WCT and WPPT)? To which other international treaties and agreements relevant for copyright and related rights is your country a party? 
WIPO Copyright Treaty and WIPO Performances and Phonograms Treaty was ratified by the Parliament of the Republic of Macedonia in 2003 by virtue of the Law on Ratification of the World Intellectual Property Organization Copyright Treaty (“Official Gazette of RM” - International Treaties No. 44/03) and the Law on Ratification of the World Intellectual Property Organization Performances and Phonograms Treaty (“Official Gazette of RM” - International Treaties No. 44/03). WIPO Copyright Treaty for the Republic of Macedonia entered into force on 04.02.2004, while WIPO Performances and Phonograms Treaty for the Republic of Macedonia shall enter into force on 20.03.2005. The Republic of Macedonia is also a member of multilateral international treaties regarding copyright and related rights, as follows: WTO/TRIPS Agreement (“Official Gazette of RM” - International Treaties No. 7/03); -  Convention Establishing the World Intellectual Property Organisation (WIPO Convention) on basis on succession (“Official Gazette of SFRY” - International Treaties No. 31/72); Berne Convention for the Protection of Literary and Artistic Works (Paris Act, 1971), (“Official Gazette of SFRY” - International Treaties No. 14/75, 4/86); -  Universal Copyright Convention 1952 and 1971 Universal Copyright Convention (“Official Gazette of SFRY” - International Treaties No. 54/73, 56/74); -  International Convention for the Protection of Performers, Phonogram Producers and Broadcasting Organisations (Rome Convention), (“Official Gazette of RM” - International Treaties No. 50/97) -  Convention for the Protection of Phonogram Producers Against Unauthorised Duplication of their Phonograms (Phonogram Convention), (“Official Gazette of  RM” - International Treaties No. 47/97) -  Convention Relating to the Distribution of Programme-Carrying Signals Transmitted by Satellite (Satellite Convention) on basis on succession, (“Official Gazette of SFRY”- International Treaties No. 13/77). With this, the Republic of Macedonia has met the obligations of ANNEX VII of the Stabilization and Association Agreement between the Republic of Macedonia and the European Union (SAA). The Republic of Macedonia also ratified the Computer Crime Convention in 2004  (“Official Gazette of RM”No.41/04). 
10. Does your copyright law provide for the protection of satellite broadcasting? a) If YES, do you consider that it is in conformity with the provisions of Directive 93/83/EEC, in particular as regards the principle of acquisition of broadcasting rights in accordance with the terms of this directive? Do you have a definition of communication to the public by satellite? b) If NO, do you plan to adopt any legislation in this field? Please give details and dates. 

)  Article 2 item 11 of the Law on Copyright and Related Rights (“Official Gazette of RM” No. 47/96, 3/98 and 98/02) defines the right to broadcasting as disclosure of a copyright work via radio and wireless television program signals, including satellite in coded or non-coded form or by wires, including cable or microwave systems. Also, the broadcasting by means of transmission of TV program signals on demand is considered as broadcasting. The aforesaid right adequately shall be exercised by the authors (by means of exclusive or non-exclusive transfer of rights, depending on the nature of the copyright work), by the performers (by means of exclusive or non-exclusive transfer of rights), by phonogram producers (by means of a lawfully permitted use with remuneration such as  legal licences for phonograms published for commercial purposes), by film producers (as an exclusive transfer of rights) and broadcasting organisations (hereinafter referred to as  broadcasting organisations), (as exclusive transfer of rights). 
b) Having in mind that full compatibility with the aforesaid Directive has not been achieved by virtue of the aforesaid provisions, harmonization is made with the Law Amending the Law on Copyright and Related Rights (“Official Gazette of RM” No.04/05), (hereinafter referred to as the LALCRR) by means of adding up of the definition of broadcasting.  Thus, the aforesaid definition is amended in the LALCRR  and reads as follows: Broadcasting via satellite is carried out when under control and responsibility of a broadcasting organisation program signals for emitting of a program intended for the  reception by the public are sent , in an uninterrupted communication chain leading to the satellite and back to the earth,. When the program signals are coded, broadcasting via satellite occurs under conditions that the means for decoding are available to the public through a broadcasting organisation or through another person with his/her consent. A ‘satellite’ is defined as any satellite working at the frequency reserved in accordance with the appropriate regulation regarding telecommunication for, emission  of signals intended for reception by the public or for a closed individual communication when the conditions of signal receipt are corresponding to the conditions for reception by the public. Thus, a complete harmonization with this part of the Directive referring to broadcasting via satellite is provided. 
11. Does your copyright law provide for the protection of cable retransmission? a) If YES, do you consider that it is in conformity with the provisions of Directive 93/83/EEC, in particular in relation to the following: principle of mandatory collective management extended to non-members of a collecting society; principle of good faith in the negotiations for cable retransmission and principle of mediation? b) If NO, do you plan to adopt any legislation in this field? Please, give details and dates. 

)  
The Law on Copyright and Related Rights (“Official Gazette of RM” No. 47/96, 3/98, 98/02) provides protection of cable retransmission, with the definition referred to in Article 2 item 12 of the Law on Copyright and Related Rights (hereinafter referred to as the ‘LCRR’), regarding rebroadcast  as simultaneous, complete and unaltered disclosure of a work already broadcast if it is subject to transmitting by a cable system or by microwave system and involving more than one hundred cable connections, or if the work has begun to be initially transmitted from abroad (cable retransmission). Article 139 of the LCRR stipulates obligatory collecting management with regards to cable retransmission of copyright works, except for broadcasting by broadcasting organisations (Pursuant to Article 148 paragraph 4 of the LCRR, the rights referred to in Article 139 of the LCRR shall be attained by the collecting management of the rights by the appropriate association, regardless of the fact whether a contract has been concluded with the author (lack of membership of the author). Thus, the LCRR is in complete conformity with this part of the Directive. b)  
As for the elements which have not been harmonized with the Directive, i.e., provisions on the principle of mediation for cable retransmission with obligatory clause and a clause of good faith with regards to negotiations, the Law Amending the Law on Copyright and Related Rights (“Official Gazette of RM” No.04/05), (hereinafter referred to as LALCRR), provides the following solutions:  1. By virtue of the LALCRR remuneration for the use of copyright works, i.e., subject matters of related rights, including cable retransmission, is primarily determined by means of a contract concluded between a collective management association and the national broadcasting  service, i.e., between a collective management association and a users’ association, i.e., the chamber. The users’ association, i.e., the chamber, is defined as an association, i.e. chamber representing the majority of users in the field of the determined activity, part of activity or joint activity. Until the contracted remuneration amount is determined, it is paid in accordance with the Rulebook for the Use of Copyright Works with the Tariff regarding remuneration amounts for the collective management association, upon consent of the Ministry of Culture. Neither of the contractual parties can refuse to negotiate on the contracts with regards to the aforesaid. The Rulebook including the Tariff of the association shall be applied in cases when the user or the users’ associations, i.e., the chambers, refuse to negotiate. If the collecting management association refuses to negotiate with the user or with the users’ associations, i.e., the chamber, this shall be considered grounds for deprivation of collecting management licence. The remuneration for the author shall be calculated and paid in advance, with conditions, method and amount determined by the Rulebook with regards to the Tariff, until the contract is concluded. The advance payment referred to in this paragraph shall be calculated from the funds intended for the purpose of remuneration payments determined by the contract.  2. he collecting management association is obliged to adopt the Rulebook with the Tariff for the use of the works in the procedure determined by the LALCRR, as follows: firstly, before determining the Rulebook with the Tariff for the use of copyright works, i.e., subject matters  of related rights, the association is obliged to ask for opinion on the Draft Rulebook with the Tariff from users’ associations, i.e., the chambers, as well as from the national broadcasting service as an individual user and from the Broadcasting Council; secondly, if the aforesaid subjects do not submit their opinions and proposals within 30 days, it shall be deemed that they agree with the Draft Rulebook with the Tariff; thirdly, if the association does not adopt completely or partially the opinions and the proposals from the aforesaid subjects, within 15 days from the date of their receipt, it is obliged to ask for an opinion from the Commission for Mediation in Copyrights and Related Rights with regards to the issue of disagreement; fourthly, the Commission for Mediation in Copyrights and Related Rights shall submit their opinion within 30 days from the date of receipt of the request with regards to whether the Tariff of the association covers the rights for which the association has a licence, and whether the remuneration is determined in accordance with the LALCRR, and if the Commission does not give their opinion within the determined period, it shall be deemed that the Commission agrees with the Draft Rulebook with regards to the Tariff; and fifthly, after conducting the aforesaid procedure, the association shall submit the Rulebook with the Tariff to the Ministry of Culture for approval. The Rulebook with the approved Tariff is published in the ‘Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia’ by the collective management association. If the collective management association does not submit the Rulebook with the Tariff within three months as provided by the aforesaid procedure, this shall be deemed as grounds for deprivation of the licence. Amendments and Modifications of the Rulebook with the Tariff are made by using the same method as for its adoption. With this LALCRR, the amount of the remuneration referred to in the Rulebook with the Tariff, as a rule, is determined depending on the way of the use of the work, i.e., the subject matter of related right. If the use is necessary for carrying out the business activity of the user (broadcasting, concert, dance or other similar uses) the amount is determined as a percent of the income, i.e., the profit gained by the user from the use of the copyright work, i.e., the subject matter of related right. When the user does not gain income from the use, i.e., profit, the amount of the remuneration may be determined as a percent of the costs entailed to the use as follows: remuneration for performers, costs for use of venues etc. If the use is not necessary for performing the business activity of the user, but is useful or agreeable for the beneficiaries of the services, such as: hotels and other accommodation facilities, exhibition venues, catering facilities or other public facilities, the amount of the remuneration shall be determined as a flat rate. Circumstances regarding the use, such as: type of use, area of use, category and size of the venue, duration and number of uses and discrepancy of the amounts of the prices with regards to the business of the user, shall be taken into consideration when determining the amount of the lowest percentage or the flat rate remunerations. 3. Pursuant to the LALCRR, the Commission for Mediation of Copyright and Related Rights is appointed by the Government of the Republic of Macedonia, upon a proposal from the Minister of Culture. The Commission is authorized to mediate in negotiations for concluding contracts between collective management associations and users, as well as to give opinions on the draft rulebooks with regards to Tariffs for use of the works. he Commission mediates in a negotiations and upon request of the contractual parties may give proposals on regulation of the mutual relations with regards to concluding contracts. Mediating for cable retransmission of copyright works and subject matters of related rights is obligatory. The Commission consists of a Chairman and four members with a four-year term in office. It is appointed from amongst the outstanding independent experts who can contribute to the achievement of goals established based on their experience and knowledge in the field of copyright and related rights. The Committee adopts an Operating Procedure providing methods of decision making with regards to cases determined by the aforesaid Law. The Commission may invite an authorised representative of each contractual party and other experts for relevant fields to attend their meetings. The representatives of the contractual parties and the experts invited shall participate in the work of the Committee having equal rights except for the right to vote. The Commission adopts the proposal for the regulation of mutual relations with regards to concluding mediated contracts and the opinion on the Draft Rulebook with the Tariff for use of copyright works, i.e., subject matters of related right, with a majority of votes of the total number of members. The members of the Committee and the other experts invited to the session are also entitled to remuneration. The amount of the remuneration is determined by the Minister of Culture and provided by the contractual parties in equal amounts.  4. The LALCRR provides that when the contractual parties during negotiations for concluding separate contracts for remuneration for the copyright works use, i.e., subject matters of related rights, do not reach agreement concerning the provisions of the contract and do not conclude it, any one of the contractual parties may demand mediation from the Commission. In capacity of an intermediary, the Commission is authorised to help the contractual parties and give proposals on the regulation of the mutual relations with regards to concluding the contract in question upon request from the contractual parties.  The proposals shall be delivered to the contractual parties personally or via registered mail. The proposals of the Commission are considered accepted if none of the contractual parties has expressed disagreement in writing within three months from the date of receipt. The disagreement shall be delivered to the Commission personally or by registered mail. 
C. Industrial Property Rights 
Patents 
1. Please give a target date by which your country intends to file its application for membership of the European Patent Organisation. 
The Republic of Macedonia plans to submit an application for membership to the European Patent Organization in 2006. The Parliament of the Republic of Macedonia has ratified the Agreement on Co-operation in the Field of Patents with the European Patent Organization on 18.09.1997 (“Official Gazette of RM” No. 49/97). The Agreement was signed by the Government of the Republic of Macedonia and the European Paten Organization by exchange of letters on 24.06.1997 for a period of 5 years and it was renewed twice for the following periods of 2 years each. It is still in effect. 
2. Please give an indication of areas of patent law/practice which will require changes/adaptations before your country can accede to the European Patent Convention. 
Patent rights protection regulated with the Law on Industrial Property adopted in 2002 (“Official Gazette of RM” No. 47/02, 42/03 and 09/04) is in complete compliance with the European Patent Convention. 
3. Please give an indication by when and how you intend to grant patent agents in your country the basic freedoms they enjoy under Community law? 
In line with EU legislation, the fundamental human rights and freedoms apply also to the patent agents.  Most of the patent agents in the Republic of Macedonia are lawyers, and the legal profession is an independent profession guaranteed by the Constitution of the Republic of Macedonia. At the same time, the agents in the field of industrial property are organized in the Association of Industrial Property Agents founded in 1994, through which they attain part of their freedoms and rights. Article 16 of the Law on Industrial Property (“Official Gazette of RM” No. 47/02, 42/03, 9/04) related to Article 227 of the same Law, regulates the conditions to be met by natural and legal entities in order to be registered as agents in the field of industrial property (our Law does not make difference between the agent types in the field of industrial property such as patent agents, trademarks agents etc.). The aforesaid Law is compatible with the WTO Agreement on Trade Related Aspects of Intellectual Property Rights and with the minimal rights based on the Paris Convention on Industrial Property Protection providing that the member states may also stipulate particular conditions in their national legislations to be met by individuals whose business activity is to represent others in the field of industrial property. Thus, special conditions apply also regarding representation of foreign natural and legal entities at the State Office of Industrial Property in the Republic of Macedonia. In the upcoming period, based on experiences and cooperation with the European Patent Office and the national institutions of EU member states, the Republic of Macedonia will upgrade the system of representing and will work on the achievement of EU standards. 
4. In your country, what are the specific rules for patent of biotechnological and computer-implemented inventions? 
There are no specific rules for patenting of biotechnological inventions provided by virtue of the Law on Industrial Property adopted in 2002 (“Official Gazette of  RM” No. 47/02, 42/03 and 09/04). In line with Article 19 paragraph 2 item 3, the inventions whose subject matter of protection are computer programs are not deemed to be inventions. There is an exception to the stipulation above for cases when the protection has not been demanded of for the subject matter of the invention as such. 
5. Has your country already modified its legislation in order to comply with the content of Directive 98/44/EC on biotechnological inventions? a) If YES, is the law now fully in conformity or are further modifications required; if so, which and by when do you plan to adopt them? b) If NO, give a target date by which your country will programme the appropriate modifications. 
The Republic of Macedonia has not modified the legal regulations in order to comply with EU Directive 98/44/EC for biotechnological inventions.  (b) The Action Plan for European Partnership of 2004 in the part referring compliance of the Macedonian legislation with EU legislation in the field of industrial property provides that EU Directive 98/44/EC is to be implemented in the national legislation not later than 2006. The Draft Law on Seeds and Propagating Material of Agricultural Plants is in progress (in the second quarter of 2005 will be submitted for a debate to the Government of the Republic of Macedonia) and it will be compliant with the EU legislation. It provides that the seeds and propagating material of genetically modified sorts of agricultural plants shall be labelled additionally. 
6. In your country, do inventions in the pharmaceutical, chemical and foodstuffs sectors enjoy product patent protection? a) If YES, since when? b) If NO, have you programmed the introduction of product patent protection for this kind of invention? 
Pursuant to the Law on Industrial Property (“Official Gazette of RM” No. 47/02, 42/03 and 09/04), an invention shall be protected in all fields of techniques and technology. 
a) 
Since 15.07.1993 when the Law on Industrial Property (“Official Gazette of RM” No. 42/93) entered into force. 
7. Are Supplementary Protection Certificates for pharmaceutical products available in your country? a) If YES, since when? b) If NO, please indicate a target date by which your country intends to introduce such a system. 
The Law on Industrial Property (“Official Gazette of RM” No. 47/02, 42/03 and 09/04) regulates the Supplementary Protection Certificate for pharmaceutical products.  
a) 
By applying the Law on Industrial Property (“Official Gazette of RM” No. 47/02, 42/03 and 09/04) implemented from 01.01.2004. 
8. Are Supplementary Protection Certificates for plant protection products available in your country? a) If YES, since when? b) If NO, please indicate a target date by which your country intends to introduce such a system. 
The Law on Industrial Property (“Official Gazette of RM” No. 47/02, 42/03 and 09/04) regulates the Supplementary Protection Certificate for plant protection products. 
a) 
Since the adoption of Law on Industrial Property (“Official Gazette of RM” No. 47/02, 42/03 and 09/04) implemented as from 01.01.2004. 
Trademarks 
1. Has your country already modified its trademark law in order to comply with the content of Directive 89/104/EEC on the approximation of the laws relating to trademarks? a) If YES, is the law now fully in conformity or are further modifications required; if so, which and by when do you plan to adopt them? b) If NO, give a target date by which your country will programme the appropriate modifications. 
The Law on Industrial Property (“Official Gazette of  RM” No. 47/02, 42/03 and 9/04) adopted in June 2002 is completely compliant with EEC Directive 89/104 as for the part regarding trade marks. 
2. What means does a holder of a registered trademark have to prevent third parties from using his trademark for products or services other than those for which the trademark has been registered? 
Pursuant to Article 149 of the Law on Industrial Property (“Official Gazette of RM” No. 47/02, 42/03 and 09/04), a holder of a registered trademark is entitled to the right to prohibit the use of the trademark identical or similar to the trademark for different products and services if the aforesaid trademark is known in the Republic of Macedonia. The holder has the aforesaid right provided that trademark used by third parties without his/her consent, harms the distinctive character or reputation of the trademark in question or is considered to be unfair competition. In case of violation of the industrial property rights, Part V of the Law on Industrial Property referring to judicial protection (i.e., Articles 201 and 202 thereof) provides that the trademark right holder may take action and plead the following: 1.  compensation for damages; 2.  have the person who has violated his/her right ordered to restrain from further violations; 3.  confiscation or destruction of products manufactured or put into sales used for the purpose of violation of the right ; 4.   submission of documents and data  by the person who has violated his/her right and 5.  Announcement of the sentence which establishes the violation in the media at the expense of the defendant. The Law on Industrial Property (i.e., Articles 213, 214 and 215 thereof) provides security measures as follows: 1. provisional measures 2.  submission of data and other documents from persons related to the violation 3. Customs measures 4. civil penalty. Article 228 of the Law on Industrial Property provides penalty measures referring to the violation of trademark holder’s rights. Models and Designs 

1. Has your country already modified its legislation in order to comply with the content of Directive 98/71/EC on the approximation of the laws relating to models and designs? a) If YES, is the law now fully in conformity or are further modifications required; if so, which and by when do you plan to adopt them? b) If NO, give a target date by which your country will programme the appropriate modifications. 
The Law on Industrial Property (“Official Gazette of RM” No. 47/02, 42/03 and 9/04) adopted in June 2002 is completely compliant with EC Directive 98/71 with regards to the part referring industrial design. 